Florida, session 2026, HB1543.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section
1002.333, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.333 Persistently low-performing schools.—
(7) FACILITIES.—
(a) A school of hope shall use facilities that comply with
the Florida Building Code, except for the State Requirements for
Educational Facilities. A school of hope that uses school
district facilities must comply with the State Requirements for
Educational Facilities only if the school district and the hope
operator have entered into a mutual management plan for the
reasonable maintenance of such facilities. The mutual management
plan shall contain a provision by which the district school
board agrees to maintain the school facilities in the same
manner as its other public schools within the district or a
provision that provides for the school of hope and district
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1543-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1543 2026
school board to share the maintenance and other costs for such
school facilities. A school of hope may colocate with another
school in a public school facility. The school district must
permit any school of hope to use all or part of underused,
vacant, or surplus school district facilities, and receive
facility-related services, pursuant to State Board of Education
rule. Students enrolled in the school of hope shall be included
in the district's total capital outlay full-time equivalent
membership for the purpose of s. 1013.62 and for calculating the
Public Education Capital Outlay maintenance funds or any other
maintenance funds for the facility. The local governing
authority shall not adopt or impose any local building
requirements or site-development restrictions, such as parking
and site-size criteria, student enrollment, and occupant load,
that are addressed by and more stringent than those found in the
State Requirements for Educational Facilities of the Florida
Building Code. A local governing authority must treat schools of
hope equitably in comparison to similar requirements,
restrictions, and site planning processes imposed upon public
schools. The agency having jurisdiction for inspection of a
facility and issuance of a certificate of occupancy or use shall
be the local municipality or, if in an unincorporated area, the
county governing authority. If an official or employee of the
local governing authority refuses to comply with this paragraph,
the aggrieved school or entity has an immediate right to bring
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1543-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1543 2026
an action in circuit court to enforce its rights by injunction.
An aggrieved party that receives injunctive relief may be
awarded reasonable attorney fees and court costs.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1543-00